apertium-tgk-pes.tgk.dix
    <pardef n="к/ун.анда__vblex"> <!-- Present participle and verbal adverb -->
      <e>       <p><l>анда</l><r><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>анда</l><r><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V_verb"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>он</l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>он</l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V_verb"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"> <!-- Personal suffixes for present tense (vowel ending stem I) -->
      <e>       <p><l>ям</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ӣ</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>яд</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ем</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ед</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>янд</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="к/ард.ан__vblex"> <!-- Personal suffixes for present tense (consonant ending stem I) -->
      <e>       <p><l>ам</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ӣ</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ад</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ем</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ед</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>анд</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="кард/ан__vblex"> <!-- Tenses and non-finite forms formed from stem II -->
      <e>       <p><l>ан</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> 
      <e>       <p><l>ан</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C_verb"/></e> 
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>агӣ</l><r><s n="ppgi"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>агист</l><r><s n="pic"/></r></p><par n="кард.ан__vblex"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="S__будан"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="кард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"> <!-- Tenses formed from me- prefix and stem II -->
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="кард.ан__vblex"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="dur"/></r></p><par n="S__будан"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>агист</l><r><s n="ftc"/></r></p><par n="кард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="кардан"><p><l>кун</l><r>кардан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="к/ун.анда__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="рафтан"><p><l>рав</l><r>рафтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="шудан"><p><l>нашуд</l><r>шудан<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="рустан"><p><l>ру</l><r>рустан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="рустан"><p><l>меруст</l><r>рустан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="шекастан"><p><l>шекан</l><r>шекастан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="шекастан"><p><l>намешекаст</l><r>шекастан<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="омадан"><p><l>о</l><r>омадан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="омадан"><p><l>мео</l><r>омадан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="гоштан"><p><l>ангор</l><r>гоштан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="дохтан"><p><l>дохт</l><r>дохтан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="дохтан"><p><l>медохт</l><r>дохтан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="афрӯхтан"><p><l>афрӯз</l><r>афрӯхтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="афшурдан"><p><l>наафшурд</l><r>афшурдан<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="барафроштан"><p><l>барафроз</l><r>барафроштан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="барафрӯхтан"><p><l>мебарафрӯхт</l><r>барафрӯхтан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="бардоштан"><p><l>намебардошт</l><r>бардоштан<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="барзадан"><p><l>барзан</l><r>барзадан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="бозгаштан"><p><l>бозгашт</l><r>бозгаштан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="бозгаштан"><p><l>бозмегашт</l><r>бозгаштан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="бурдан"><p><l>бар</l><r>бурдан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="гаштан"><p><l>нагашт</l><r>гаштан<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="гузаштан"><p><l>мегузашт</l><r>гузаштан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="гузоштан"><p><l>намегузошт</l><r>гузоштан<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="гумоштан"><p><l>гумор</l><r>гумоштан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ғунудан"><p><l>меғунуд</l><r>ғунудан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="даровардан"><p><l>дарор</l><r>даровардан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="додан"><p><l>надод</l><r>додан<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="истодан"><p><l>меистод</l><r>истодан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="кофтан"><p><l>коб</l><r>кофтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="навохтан"><p><l>навохт</l><r>навохтан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="навохтан"><p><l>менавохт</l><r>навохтан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="нишастан"><p><l>нишин</l><r>нишастан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="омӯхтан"><p><l>меомӯхт</l><r>омӯхтан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ошуфтан"><p><l>намеошуфт</l><r>ошуфтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="пазируфтан"><p><l>пазир</l><r>пазируфтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="пухтан"><p><l>мепухт</l><r>пухтан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="сохтан"><p><l>соз</l><r>сохтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="суфтан"><p><l>насуфт</l><r>суфтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="тохтан"><p><l>тоз</l><r>тохтан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="к/ун.анда__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="тохтан"><p><l>метохт</l><r>тохтан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="фиристодан"><p><l>фирист</l><r>фиристодан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ҷастан"><p><l>ҷаст</l><r>ҷастан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ҷастан"><p><l>меҷаст</l><r>ҷастан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="шитофтан"><p><l>шитоб</l><r>шитофтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="баромадан"><p><l>баро</l><r>баромадан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="даромадан"><p><l>даро</l><r>даромадан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="даромадан"><p><l>медаромад</l><r>даромадан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="зудудан"><p><l>зудо</l><r>зудудан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="кушодан"><p><l>кушо</l><r>кушодан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="кушодан"><p><l>намекушод</l><r>кушодан<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="намудан"><p><l>намо</l><r>намудан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="озмӯдан"><p><l>озмо</l><r>озмӯдан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="олудан"><p><l>оло</l><r>олудан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="оростан"><p><l>оро</l><r>оростан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="осудан"><p><l>осо</l><r>осудан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="паймудан"><p><l>мепаймуд</l><r>паймудан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="рабудан"><p><l>рабо</l><r>рабудан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="сурудан"><p><l>саро</l><r>сурудан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="фарсудан"><p><l>фарсо</l><r>фарсудан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="фарсудан"><p><l>нафарсуд</l><r>фарсудан<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="афзудан"><p><l>афзо</l><r>афзудан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="бозгуфтан"><p><l>мебозгуфт</l><r>бозгуфтан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ҷустан"><p><l>ҷӯ</l><r>ҷустан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="афкдан"><p><l>афкан</l><r>афкдан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="баргаштан"><p><l>баргашт</l><r>баргаштан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="баргаштан"><p><l>бармегашт</l><r>баргаштан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="донистан"><p><l>намедон</l><r>донистан<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="макидан"><p><l>мемакид</l><r>макидан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="бахшидан"><p><l>намебахшид</l><r>бахшидан<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="хобидан"><p><l>намехоб</l><r>хобидан<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="к/ард.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="чаридан"><p><l>мечарид</l><r>чаридан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ме.кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="озмудан"><p><l>озмо</l><r>озмудан<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="гу/фт.ан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="харидан"><p><l>нахарид</l><r>харидан<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="кард/ан__vblex"/></e>
